Wisconsin, session 2025, AB381.
do enact as follows:AB381,13Section 1. 146.67 of the statutes is created to read:AB381,2,21146.67 Perimenopause and menopause education. (1) The department 2shall do all of the following:AB381,2,73(a) Enter into partnerships with health care providers, including 4obstetricians and gynecologists, and community health centers, as defined in s. 5250.15 (1) (a), and hospitals to educate women on the symptoms, processes, and 6other issues surrounding perimenopause and menopause so that women may be 7prepared for perimenopause and menopause.AB381,2,128(b) Create informational materials, in coordination with the partners 9described in par. (a), in electronic and physical form, that may be distributed to or 10accessed by women who are determined by their health care provider to be 11experiencing or will soon be experiencing perimenopause and menopause. The 12informational materials shall include information regarding all of the following:AB381,2,13131. Symptoms of and treatments for perimenopause and menopause.AB381,2,15142. Symptoms of perimenopause and menopause for which a woman would 15consult a health care provider.AB381,2,16163. The biological process behind perimenopause and menopause.AB381,2,17174. How to talk to family and friends about perimenopause and menopause.AB381,2,19185. Any other information that the department determines is necessary to 19prepare and educate women regarding perimenopause and menopause.AB381,220Section 2. Effective date.AB381,2,2221(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 3rd month beginning after 22publication.AB381,2,2323